Colorado statutes. TITLE 30 Government - County
PART 4 GENERAL REGULATIONS
Following review of all proposals properly submitted, the governing body shall award a contract for the provision of residential waste services based upon the criteria set forth in the request for proposals.

As used in this subsection (7.5), "residential waste services" means the collection and transportation of ashes, trash, waste, rubbish, garbage or industrial waste products, or any other discarded materials from sources other than industrial or commercial establishments or multifamily residences of eight or more units.

(7.7) (a) If the governing body of a jurisdiction selects a proposal submitted by the jurisdiction, any private person who submitted a proposal may request a review of the selection as provided in this subsection (7.7). A request for review shall be submitted to the governing body in writing within ten days following selection of the jurisdiction's proposal. The filing of a request shall suspend the award until the completion of the review provided in this subsection (7.7).

Upon receipt of a request, the governing body, or its designee, shall promptly select a reviewing auditor to conduct the review. The reviewing auditor shall commence and complete its review as expeditiously as practicable.

As a part of that review, the reviewing auditor shall afford the person who submitted the request for review the opportunity to present the reviewing auditor his or her views with respect to the governing body's determination, subject to any reasonable procedures, guidelines, and limitations as the reviewing auditor may prescribe, including but not limited to requiring that those views be expressed in writing and submitted by a specific date and time. No person shall be permitted to alter any previously submitted proposal in any respect.

The reviewing auditor shall review each of the proposals submitted, but the review shall be limited to determining:

Whether the selection of the jurisdiction's proposal was made in a manner contrary to the procedure set forth in subsection (7.5) of this section or in the request for proposals;

Whether the selection of the jurisdiction's proposal was clearly erroneous in light of the criteria set forth in the request for proposals; and

Whether the certification of an independent auditor provided pursuant to subparagraph (II) of paragraph (c) of subsection (7.5) of this section is materially inaccurate.

Should the reviewing auditor find that the governing body's selection of a proposal was improper, the determination of the governing body shall be void, and the governing body shall reconsider as expeditiously as is practicable all proposals timely submitted and determine which proposals it will accept, giving due regard to the determination of the reviewing auditor. No person shall be entitled to alter any previously submitted proposal in any respect. If the reviewing auditor finds that the governing body's selection of a proposal was proper, the selection shall be valid and conclusive and shall not be subject to further challenge or review.

The reviewing auditor's fee for performing a review pursuant to this subsection (7.7) shall be paid by the private person requesting the review; except that, if the governing body's selection of a proposal is found to be improper by the reviewing auditor, the municipality or city and county shall pay the fee.

As used in this subsection (7.7), a reviewing auditor shall be a qualified, licensed, independent public accountant or public accounting firm selected by the governing body and shall certify to the governing body in writing that it is not being retained currently, has not been retained within the previous five years, and currently has no basis for believing it will be retained in the future by the governing body, any persons who have submitted proposals, or, to the accountant's or firm's knowledge after due inquiry, any of the governing body's or person's affiliates, partners, or relatives for the performance of accounting or other services.

No ordinance, resolution, rule, regulation, service, function, or exercise of an authorized power pursuant to this section or section 30-11-101 (1)(f) or (1)(g) or 30-11-107 (1)(u), (1)(w), (1)(y), (1)(z), or (1)(bb) or 25-1-508 (5)(g) or (5)(j), C.R.S., shall apply within the corporate limits of any incorporated municipality, nor to any municipal service, function, facility, or property whether owned by or leased to the incorporated municipality, outside the municipal boundaries, unless the municipality consents. If the municipality consents that any ordinance, resolution, rule, regulation, service, function, or exercise of an authorized power shall apply within the municipality or to municipal services, functions, facilities, or property outside the municipal boundaries, such ordinance, resolution, rule, regulation, service, function, or exercise of an authorized power shall be uniform within the municipality and the applicable unincorporated areas of the county, unless the county and the municipality agree otherwise pursuant to part 2 of article 1 of title 29, C.R.S.

No ordinance, resolution, rule, regulation, service, function, or exercise of an authorized power pursuant to this section shall apply within the jurisdictional boundaries of any special district enumerated in this subsection (9), nor to any special district service, function, facility, or property whether owned by or leased to the special district outside the special district boundaries if such ordinance, resolution, rule, regulation, service, function, or exercise of an authorized power would duplicate or interfere with any service or facility authorized and provided by such special district or contravene any power authorized and exercised by such special district, unless the county is specifically empowered by law to exercise authority with respect thereto, or the county and the special district agree otherwise pursuant to part 2 of article 1 of title 29, C.R.S.

For purposes of this subsection (9), "special district" means any special district established pursuant to article 1 of title 32, C.R.S., the three lakes water and sanitation district established pursuant to article 10 of title 32, C.R.S., the urban drainage and flood control district established pursuant to article 11 of title 32, C.R.S., any metropolitan sewage disposal district established pursuant to part 4 of article 4 of title 32, C.R.S., any drainage district established pursuant to article 20 of title 37, C.R.S., the Cherry Creek basin water quality authority established pursuant to article 8.5 of title 25, C.R.S., any regional service authority established pursuant to article 7 of title 32, C.R.S., and the regional transportation district established pursuant to article 9 of title 32, C.R.S.

Repealed.

If a county is the permittee of a municipal separate storm sewer system permit issued pursuant to part 5 of article 8 of title 25, C.R.S., the board of county commissioners may adopt a storm water ordinance to develop, implement, and enforce the storm water management program required by the permit.
(11) (a) (I) If a county is the permittee of a municipal separate storm sewer system permit issued pursuant to part 5 of article 8 of title 25, C.R.S., the board of county commissioners may adopt a storm water ordinance to develop, implement, and enforce the storm water management program required by the permit.

The storm water ordinance may specify that the county may:

Provide for and compel the abatement of any condition that causes or contributes to a violation of the permit or requirement from any property located within the unincorporated portion of the county at such time, upon such notice, and in such manner consistent with the terms of the permit as the board of county commissioners may prescribe by ordinance;

Perform the abatement upon notice to and failure of the property owner to abate such condition; and

Assess the reasonable cost of the abatement, including five percent for inspection and other incidental costs in connection therewith, upon the property from which such condition has been abated.

Storm water ordinances adopted pursuant to this subsection (11) shall include provisions for applying for and exercising an administrative entry and seizure warrant issued by a county or district court having jurisdiction over the property from which the condition is to be abated. An assessment pursuant to this subsection (11) shall, once recorded, be a lien against such property until paid and shall have priority based upon its date of recording. If the assessment is not paid within a reasonable time specified by ordinance, the county clerk and recorder may certify that fact to the county treasurer, who shall collect the assessment, together with a ten percent penalty for the cost of collection, in the same manner as other taxes are collected. The laws of this state for assessment and collection of general taxes, including the laws for the sale and redemption of property for taxes, shall apply to the collection of assessments pursuant to this subsection (11).

A county court or district court having jurisdiction over the property from which such condition is to be abated pursuant to the storm water ordinance shall issue an administrative entry and seizure warrant for the abatement of such condition upon presentation by a county of:

Ordinance provisions that meet the requirements of paragraph (a) of this subsection (11);

A sworn or affirmed affidavit stating the factual basis for such warrant;

Evidence that the property owner has received notice of the condition and has failed to abate the condition within a reasonable prescribed period;

A general description of the location of the property that is the subject of the warrant; and

A general list of corrective action needed.

Within ten days after the date of issuance of an administrative entry and seizure warrant pursuant to the provisions of this paragraph (b), the executing authority shall:

Execute such warrant in accordance with directions by the issuing court;

Provide or mail a copy of such warrant to the property owner; and

Submit proof of the execution of such warrant, including a written inventory of any property impounded by the executing authority, to the court.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire part added, p. 1144, § 1, effective May 24.

L. 80:

(1)(a) amended and (3) to (7) added, p. 744, § 7, effective June 30; (1)(i) added, p. 479, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 82:

(1)(c) amended, p. 626, § 31, effective April 12.

L. 83:

(1)(a)(I) amended, p. 1488, § 3, effective June 1; (1)(j) added, p. 718, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 84:

(1)(n) added, p. 442, § 2, effective March 16.

L. 85:

(1)(l) added, p. 1059, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 86:

(1)(c) amended, p. 784, § 6, effective April 21.

L. 87:

(1)(a)(I) amended and (1)(a)(I.5) added, p. 1208, § 1, effective May 14; (3) amended, p. 1570, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 88:

(1)(m) added, p. 1115, § 1, effective May 19.

L. 90:

IP(1), (1)(a)(V), and (1)(h) amended and (1)(n) to (1)(q), (8), and (9) added, p. 1449, §§ 3, 4, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(1)(p) amended, p. 1919, § 44, effective June 1.

L. 92:

(1)(a)(I) and (1)(a)(I.5) amended, p. 967, § 11, effective June 1.

L. 93:

(1)(q) amended, p. 1199, § 18, effective July 1.

L. 93, 1st Ex. Sess.:

(1)(d.5) added, p. 34, § 2, effective September 13.

L. 94:

(6) and (7) amended and (7.5) and (7.7) added, p. 698, § 1, effective April 19; (1)(a)(V)(D) amended and (1)(k.5) and (1)(o.5) added, p. 1238, § 9, effective May 22; (1)(m)(I) and (3) amended, p. 2564, § 77, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 95:

(1)(n.5) added, p. 546, § 1, effective May 22.

L. 98:

(1.5) added, p. 153, § 1, effective July 1; (1)(d.5) amended, p. 826, § 41, effective August 5.

L. 99:

(1)(d.5) amended, p. 270, § 1, effective August 4; (1)(h) amended, p. 368, § 3, effective August 4.

L. 2002, 3rd Ex. Sess.:

(1)(n.5) amended, p. 43, § 1, effective July 18.

L. 2004:

(1)(n.5) amended, p. 1966, § 5, effective August 4.

L. 2006:

(1)(a)(I.5)(A) amended, p. 138, § 1, effective August 7.

L. 2006, 1st Ex. Sess.:

(10) added, p. 29, § 2, effective January 1, 2007.

L. 2007:

(11) added, p. 400, § 1, effective April 9; (1)(n.5) amended and (1)(n.7) added, p. 492, § 2, effective August 3.

L. 2008:

(1)(a)(V)(B) and (8) amended, p. 2054, § 11, effective July 1; (2)(a) amended, p. 58, § 3, effective August 5.

L. 2010:

(1)(r) added, (HB 10-1118), ch. 348, p. 1606, § 1, effective August 11.

L. 2011:

IP(1) and (1)(n.5) amended, (SB 11-110), ch.110, p. 342, § 2, effective April 13.

L. 2013:

(1) (a) (I.5) (A) amended, (HB 13-1137), ch. 15, p. 39, § 1, effective August 7; IP (1) (n.5) (II) amended, (HB 13-1300), ch. 316, p. 1694, § 98, effective August 7.

L. 2017:

IP(1), (1)(i), and (1)(k) amended, (SB 17-228), ch. 246, p. 1041, § 6, effective August 9; IP(1) and (1)(n.7) amended, (SB 17-222), ch. 245, p. 1027, § 4, effective August 9.

L. 2019:

IP(1)(n.5)(V), (1)(n.5)(V)(A), and (1)(n.7) amended, (SB 19-019), ch. 44, p. 150, § 1, effective March 21; IP(1), IP(1)(m)(II), and (1)(m)(II)(B) amended, (SB 19-181), ch. 120, p. 505, § 5, effective April 16; (1.7) added, (SB 19-240), ch. 351, p. 3244, § 2, effective May 29; (1.5) amended, (HB 19-1033), ch. 53, p. 185, § 4, effective July 1; (1.5) amended, (HB 19-1076), ch. 337, p. 3098, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 2020:

(1.5) amended, (HB 20-1001), ch. 302, p. 1505, § 5, effective July 14; (1)(s) added, (HB 20-1093), ch. 65, p. 265, § 1, effective September 14; (7)(a) amended, (HB 20-1074), ch. 48, p. 166, § 2, effective September 14.

L. 2021:

(1)(t) added, (SB 21-070), ch. 23, p. 108, § 1, effective September 7; (10) repealed, (SB 21-077), ch. 186, p. 997, § 5, effective September 7; (1)(d.5) amended, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 751, § 137, effective October 1; (10) repealed, (SB 21-199), ch. 351, p. 2282, § 5, effective July 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

Amendments to this subsection (1.5) by HB 19-1033 and HB 19-1076 were harmonized.

Cross references:

(1) For similar provisions concerning the exercise of police power by municipalities, see § 31-15-401.

(2) For the legislative declaration in the 2011 act amending the introductory portion to subsection (1) and subsection (1)(n.5), see section 1 of chapter 110, Session Laws of Colorado 2011.